extensions/quarto/packages/editor-server/src/resources/dictionaries/es_ES.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX Ü Y 264
SFX Ü amar ámemela amar
SFX Ü amar ámemelas amar
SFX Ü amar ámemelo amar
SFX Ü amar ámemelos amar
SFX Ü amar ámenmela amar
SFX Ü amar ámenmelas amar
SFX Ü amar ámenmelo amar
SFX Ü amar ámenmelos amar
SFX Ü amar ámennosla amar
SFX Ü amar ámennoslas amar
SFX Ü amar ámennoslo amar
SFX Ü amar ámennoslos amar
SFX Ü amar ámenosla amar
SFX Ü amar ámenoslas amar
SFX Ü amar ámenoslo amar
SFX Ü amar ámenoslos amar
SFX Ü amar ámensela amar
SFX Ü amar ámenselas amar
SFX Ü amar ámenselo amar
SFX Ü amar ámenselos amar
SFX Ü amar ámesela amar
SFX Ü amar ámeselas amar
SFX Ü amar ámeselo amar
SFX Ü amar ámeselos amar
SFX Ü ear éemela ear
SFX Ü ear éemelas ear
SFX Ü ear éemelo ear
SFX Ü ear éemelos ear
SFX Ü ear éenmela ear
SFX Ü ear éenmelas ear
SFX Ü ear éenmelo ear
SFX Ü ear éenmelos ear
SFX Ü ear éennosla ear
SFX Ü ear éennoslas ear
SFX Ü ear éennoslo ear
SFX Ü ear éennoslos ear
SFX Ü ear éenosla ear
SFX Ü ear éenoslas ear
SFX Ü ear éenoslo ear
SFX Ü ear éenoslos ear
SFX Ü ear éensela ear
SFX Ü ear éenselas ear
SFX Ü ear éenselo ear
SFX Ü ear éenselos ear
SFX Ü ear éesela ear
SFX Ü ear éeselas ear
SFX Ü ear éeselo ear
SFX Ü ear éeselos ear
SFX Ü edar édemela edar
SFX Ü edar édemelas edar
SFX Ü edar édemelo edar
SFX Ü edar édemelos edar
SFX Ü edar édenmela edar
SFX Ü edar édenmelas edar
SFX Ü edar édenmelo edar
SFX Ü edar édenmelos edar
SFX Ü edar édennosla edar
SFX Ü edar édennoslas edar
SFX Ü edar édennoslo edar
SFX Ü edar édennoslos edar
SFX Ü edar édenosla edar
SFX Ü edar édenoslas edar
SFX Ü edar édenoslo edar
SFX Ü edar édenoslos edar
SFX Ü edar édensela edar
SFX Ü edar édenselas edar
SFX Ü edar édenselo edar
SFX Ü edar édenselos edar
SFX Ü edar édesela edar
SFX Ü edar édeselas edar
SFX Ü edar édeselo edar
SFX Ü edar édeselos edar
SFX Ü eer éamela eer
SFX Ü eer éamelas eer
SFX Ü eer éamelo eer
SFX Ü eer éamelos eer
SFX Ü eer éanmela eer
SFX Ü eer éanmelas eer
SFX Ü eer éanmelo eer
SFX Ü eer éanmelos eer
SFX Ü eer éannosla eer
SFX Ü eer éannoslas eer
SFX Ü eer éannoslo eer
SFX Ü eer éannoslos eer
SFX Ü eer éanosla eer
SFX Ü eer éanoslas eer
SFX Ü eer éanoslo eer
SFX Ü eer éanoslos eer
SFX Ü eer éansela eer
SFX Ü eer éanselas eer
SFX Ü eer éanselo eer
SFX Ü eer éanselos eer
SFX Ü eer éasela eer
SFX Ü eer éaselas eer
SFX Ü eer éaselo eer
SFX Ü eer éaselos eer
SFX Ü egar éguemela egar
SFX Ü egar éguemelas egar
SFX Ü egar éguemelo egar
SFX Ü egar éguemelos egar
SFX Ü egar éguenmela egar
SFX Ü egar éguenmelas egar
SFX Ü egar éguenmelo egar
SFX Ü egar éguenmelos egar
SFX Ü egar éguennosla egar
SFX Ü egar éguennoslas egar
SFX Ü egar éguennoslo egar
SFX Ü egar éguennoslos egar
SFX Ü egar éguenosla egar
SFX Ü egar éguenoslas egar
SFX Ü egar éguenoslo egar
SFX Ü egar éguenoslos egar
SFX Ü egar éguensela egar
SFX Ü egar éguenselas egar
SFX Ü egar éguenselo egar
SFX Ü egar éguenselos egar
SFX Ü egar éguesela egar
SFX Ü egar égueselas egar
SFX Ü egar égueselo egar
SFX Ü egar égueselos egar
SFX Ü ejar éjemela ejar
SFX Ü ejar éjemelas ejar
SFX Ü ejar éjemelo ejar
SFX Ü ejar éjemelos ejar
SFX Ü ejar éjenmela ejar
SFX Ü ejar éjenmelas ejar
SFX Ü ejar éjenmelo ejar
SFX Ü ejar éjenmelos ejar
SFX Ü ejar éjennosla ejar
SFX Ü ejar éjennoslas ejar
SFX Ü ejar éjennoslo ejar
SFX Ü ejar éjennoslos ejar
SFX Ü ejar éjenosla ejar
SFX Ü ejar éjenoslas ejar
SFX Ü ejar éjenoslo ejar
SFX Ü ejar éjenoslos ejar
SFX Ü ejar éjensela ejar
SFX Ü ejar éjenselas ejar
SFX Ü ejar éjenselo ejar
SFX Ü ejar éjenselos ejar
SFX Ü ejar éjesela ejar
SFX Ü ejar éjeselas ejar
SFX Ü ejar éjeselo ejar
SFX Ü ejar éjeselos ejar
SFX Ü ender éndamela ender
SFX Ü ender éndamelas ender
SFX Ü ender éndamelo ender
SFX Ü ender éndamelos ender
SFX Ü ender éndanmela ender
SFX Ü ender éndanmelas ender
SFX Ü ender éndanmelo ender
SFX Ü ender éndanmelos ender
SFX Ü ender éndannosla ender
SFX Ü ender éndannoslas ender
SFX Ü ender éndannoslo ender
SFX Ü ender éndannoslos ender
SFX Ü ender éndanosla ender
SFX Ü ender éndanoslas ender
SFX Ü ender éndanoslo ender
SFX Ü ender éndanoslos ender
SFX Ü ender éndansela ender
SFX Ü ender éndanselas ender
SFX Ü ender éndanselo ender
SFX Ü ender éndanselos ender
SFX Ü ender éndasela ender
SFX Ü ender éndaselas ender
SFX Ü ender éndaselo ender
SFX Ü ender éndaselos ender
SFX Ü entar éntemela entar
SFX Ü entar éntemelas entar
SFX Ü entar éntemelo entar
SFX Ü entar éntemelos entar
SFX Ü entar éntenmela entar
SFX Ü entar éntenmelas entar
SFX Ü entar éntenmelo entar
SFX Ü entar éntenmelos entar
SFX Ü entar éntennosla entar
SFX Ü entar éntennoslas entar
SFX Ü entar éntennoslo entar
SFX Ü entar éntennoslos entar
SFX Ü entar éntenosla entar
SFX Ü entar éntenoslas entar
SFX Ü entar éntenoslo entar
SFX Ü entar éntenoslos entar
SFX Ü entar éntensela entar
SFX Ü entar éntenselas entar
SFX Ü entar éntenselo entar
SFX Ü entar éntenselos entar
SFX Ü entar éntesela entar
SFX Ü entar énteselas entar
SFX Ü entar énteselo entar
SFX Ü entar énteselos entar
SFX Ü icar íquemela icar
SFX Ü icar íquemelas icar
SFX Ü icar íquemelo icar
SFX Ü icar íquemelos icar
SFX Ü icar íquenmela icar
SFX Ü icar íquenmelas icar
SFX Ü icar íquenmelo icar
SFX Ü icar íquenmelos icar
SFX Ü icar íquennosla icar
SFX Ü icar íquennoslas icar
SFX Ü icar íquennoslo icar
SFX Ü icar íquennoslos icar
SFX Ü icar íquenosla icar
SFX Ü icar íquenoslas icar
SFX Ü icar íquenoslo icar
SFX Ü icar íquenoslos icar
SFX Ü icar íquensela icar
SFX Ü icar íquenselas icar
SFX Ü icar íquenselo icar
SFX Ü icar íquenselos icar
SFX Ü icar íquesela icar
SFX Ü icar íqueselas icar
SFX Ü icar íqueselo icar
SFX Ü icar íqueselos icar
SFX Ü inar ínemela inar
SFX Ü inar ínemelas inar
SFX Ü inar ínemelo inar
SFX Ü inar ínemelos inar
SFX Ü inar ínenmela inar
SFX Ü inar ínenmelas inar
SFX Ü inar ínenmelo inar
SFX Ü inar ínenmelos inar
SFX Ü inar ínennosla inar
SFX Ü inar ínennoslas inar
SFX Ü inar ínennoslo inar
SFX Ü inar ínennoslos inar
SFX Ü inar ínenosla inar
SFX Ü inar ínenoslas inar
SFX Ü inar ínenoslo inar
SFX Ü inar ínenoslos inar
SFX Ü inar ínensela inar
SFX Ü inar ínenselas inar
SFX Ü inar ínenselo inar
SFX Ü inar ínenselos inar
SFX Ü inar ínesela inar
SFX Ü inar íneselas inar
SFX Ü inar íneselo inar
SFX Ü inar íneselos inar
SFX Ü itar ítemela itar
SFX Ü itar ítemelas itar
SFX Ü itar ítemelo itar
SFX Ü itar ítemelos itar
SFX Ü itar ítenmela itar
SFX Ü itar ítenmelas itar
SFX Ü itar ítenmelo itar
SFX Ü itar ítenmelos itar
SFX Ü itar ítennosla itar
SFX Ü itar ítennoslas itar
SFX Ü itar ítennoslo itar
SFX Ü itar ítennoslos itar
SFX Ü itar ítenosla itar
SFX Ü itar ítenoslas itar
SFX Ü itar ítenoslo itar
SFX Ü itar ítenoslos itar
SFX Ü itar ítensela itar
SFX Ü itar ítenselas itar
SFX Ü itar ítenselo itar
SFX Ü itar ítenselos itar
SFX Ü itar ítesela itar
SFX Ü itar íteselas itar
SFX Ü itar íteselo itar
SFX Ü itar íteselos itar
